Oklahoma, session 2025, SB649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-126 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon application for issuance or renewal of a driver license


or identification card, the applicant may elect to donate durable


medical equipment upon death to a non-profit entity selected by


Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules to allow


for the inclusion of a mark or symbol that identifies the individual


as a durable medical equipment donor and to determine the location


on the credential where such information shall be placed.





Req. No. 1213 Page 1


B. As used in this section, “durable medical equipment” means


equipment including, but not limited to, hearing aids, eyeglasses,


walkers, canes, and wheelchairs.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2024.




60-1-1213 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:40:41 AM





































Req. No. 1213 Page 2